Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 Incorporation, Organization, Subscription of Capital Stock,
Selection of Officers and Directors

46-8-40.
Grant of corporate powers and privileges to railroad companies by Secretary of State; procedure in case of disqualification of Secretary of State.

All corporate powers and privileges of railroad companies shall be issued and granted by the Secretary of State upon the terms, liabilities, and restrictions expressed in and subject to all the provisions of this chapter and of the Constitution of Georgia. If by reason of interest in the proposed corporation the Secretary of State is disqualified, the duties required to be performed by the Secretary of State shall be performed by the Commissioner of Insurance.

History.

Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 156, § 1; Code 1882, § 1689a; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 135, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2159; Civil Code 1910, § 2577; Code 1933, § 94-101; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 26.

46-8-41.
Procedures regarding preparation of petition for incorporation; filing of petition and affidavit with Secretary of State; endorsement by Secretary of State; allowance for public inspection of petition and affidavit.

Any group of ten or more persons who desire to be incorporated as a railroad company shall prepare a petition in writing, addressed to the Secretary of State, in which shall be stated:

The names and residences of each of the persons desiring to form the corporation;

The name of the railroad company they desire to have incorporated, provided that in no event shall the name selected be the name of any existing railway corporation in this state;

The length of the road, as near as can be estimated;

The general direction of the road;

The counties through which the road will probably run;

The names of the principal places from which and to which the road is to be constructed;

The amount of the proposed capital stock;

The number of years the company is to continue in existence;

If the capital stock is to consist of common or preferred stock, the amount of each class and the rights and privileges of the latter over the former;

The location of the principal office of the corporation;

A statement that the incorporators intend in good faith to go forward without delay to secure subscriptions to the capital stock and to construct, equip, maintain, and operate the railroad;

A request to be incorporated under the laws of this state; and

A statement that the incorporators have given four weeks’ notice of their intention to apply for said charter by the publication of the petition in a newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements are published in each of the counties through which the proposed road will probably run (if there is a newspaper in each of those counties), once a week for four weeks before the filing of said petition.

There shall be annexed to the petition an affidavit made by three of the persons forming the company, which affidavit shall state that the names subscribed are the genuine signatures of the persons named therein and that the facts stated in the petition are true to the best of petitioners’ knowledge, information, and belief.

The petition thus sworn to shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall endorse thereon the date of the filing and record the same in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, which book shall be open for inspection by the public at all times during the office hours of the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2160; Civil Code 1910, § 2578; Code 1933, § 94-102.

46-8-42.
Certificate of incorporation; duration of corporate existence; fee for issuance of certificate.

When the petition has been filed with the Secretary of State, he shall issue to the company under the great seal of the state the following form of certificate:

To all to whom these presents may come — Greetings:

Whereas, In pursuance of an Act of the General Assembly of the State of Georgia, approved December 17, 1892,
_______________
and
_______________
(naming the persons who sign the petition) having filed in the office of the Secretary of State a certain petition seeking the formation of a corporation to be known as (here insert name), with a capital stock of $ _______________ , for the purpose of constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating a railroad from
_______________
to
_______________ , and having complied with the statutes in such cases made and provided; therefore, the State of Georgia hereby grants unto the above-named persons, their successors and assigns, full authority, by and under the said name of
_______________ , to exercise the powers and privileges of a corporation for the purposes above stated, subject to the provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, and all the laws governing railroad companies of force at the date of this certificate, or that may hereafter become of force, either by constitutional or statute law, or by any rules and regulations of the Public Service Commission of this state, or otherwise, which govern and control the operation of railroads in this state.

In witness whereof, these presents have been signed by the Secretary of State, and to which is annexed the great seal of the state, at Atlanta, Georgia, this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________ .

Upon the issuance of the certificate, the persons who signed the petition and all persons who shall become stockholders in the company shall be a corporation by the name specified in the petition and certificate and shall possess the powers and privileges granted by, and be subject to the provisions of, this title.

The rights, powers, and privileges granted railroad corporations shall continue for a period no longer than 101 years, unless the corporation is continued by the laws in force at the expiration of 101 years.

Before the Secretary issues the certificate, the petitioners shall pay a fee of $100.00 to the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2161, 2166; Ga. L. 1903, p. 34, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2579, 2584; Code 1933, § 94-103; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-8-43.
Duties of Secretary of State prior to issuance of certificate of incorporation; certificate or duplicate thereof as evidence of existence of corporation and compliance with chapter.

Before the Secretary of State issues a certificate of incorporation pursuant to Code Section 46-8-42, he shall satisfy himself that all of the requirements of this chapter have been substantially complied with prior to the filing of said petition. Any certificate or duplicate thereof issued under this chapter by the Secretary of State shall be conclusive evidence of the existence of the corporation in all the courts in this state and of compliance with all the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2162; Civil Code 1910, § 2580; Code 1933, § 94-104.

46-8-44.
Subscription to capital stock; par value of stock; subscription to all capital stock as prerequisite to beginning railroad construction.

When the certificate of incorporation has been issued, the persons named therein, in case they have not subscribed to the entire capital stock, may open books of subscription to complete the subscription to the capital stock of the company, in such places and after giving such notice as they may deem expedient, and may from time to time receive subscriptions until all of the capital stock is subscribed to.

The capital stock of the company shall be divided into shares of $100.00 each.

The company shall not begin the construction of the railroad until all of the capital stock specified in the petition for incorporation has been subscribed to.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 4; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2162, 2164; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2580, 2582; Code 1933, § 94-201.

46-8-45.
Payment of subscriptions; procedure by directors in case of default by subscriber.

The directors may require the subscribers to the capital stock to pay the amounts variously subscribed by them, in such installments as they may deem proper; and the directors may receive cash or property, either real or personal, at the agreed value thereof, in payment of such installments.

If any subscriber neglects to pay any installment as required by resolution of the board of directors, the directors may direct an action to be brought against him forthwith for the amount of such call or may in their discretion, after 30 days’ notice to such stockholder, cause his stock, after such advertisement as may seem to them proper, to be put up at auction and sold to the highest bidder for cash. If the proceeds of sale are less than the amount of the call, the delinquent shall pay the difference; and any surplus over the amount of the call and the expenses of the advertisement and sale shall be paid to him. A new certificate of stock shall be issued to the purchaser, and he shall stand in the same relation to the company as the delinquent would have stood had he not defaulted. Such sale shall be in the city where the principal office of the company may be located, at such time and place as the board of directors may prescribe.

If for any reason it is not practicable to serve such delinquent stockholder with notice of such sale personally or by mail, or if he is a nonresident of this state, notice may be given by publication in any newspaper published in the city where the principal office of such company may be located, once a week for four weeks prior to the date of such sale.

The company may collect from delinquent subscribers by sale of the stock, by civil action, or by both remedies.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 6; Civil Code 1895, § 2164; Civil Code 1910, § 2582; Code 1933, § 94-202; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-8-46.
Procedures regarding organizational meeting; qualifications of directors; selection of officers and agents; annual election of directors; filling of vacancies on board.

When all of the capital stock has been subscribed to, the persons named in the certificate of incorporation or a majority of them are authorized to call a meeting of the stockholders for the purpose of organization, which meeting shall be held in the city in which the principal office of the company is located, and of which meeting every subscribing stockholder shall be given notice. At the meeting, persons holding a majority of the stock subscribed to shall constitute a quorum, and there shall be elected a board of directors of not less than three to manage the affairs of the company. Stock shall be represented at the meeting in person or by written proxy, each share of stock being entitled to one vote, and a plurality of votes cast being necessary to elect, said election to be governed by such bylaws as the company may prescribe, and the persons elected as directors to continue in office until others are elected to fill their places. If for any reason the election is not held at the time appointed, the same may be held at any time thereafter, of which meeting every subscribing stockholder shall be given notice. Notice of any organizational meeting under this Code section shall be effected by giving to each stockholder written notification stating the purpose of the meeting, served upon the stockholder personally or by depositing the notice in the post office, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at the post office nearest his usual residence, at least ten days before the meeting.

Directors of railroad corporations shall be natural persons of at least 18 years of age but need not be residents of this state or shareholders of the corporation unless the charter or bylaws so require. The charter or bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications for directors.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 46-8-50, the board of directors shall select from their number a president, may elect one or more vice-presidents, and may appoint a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers and agents as they may deem necessary.

The regular election for directors shall be held annually, and, unless the bylaws otherwise provide, the meeting at which such elections are held may be held within or without the state.

Vacancies in the board of directors occasioned by death, resignation, or otherwise shall be filled in such manner as shall be prescribed by the bylaws of the company.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 2163; Civil Code 1910, § 2581; Code 1933, § 94-203; Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, §§ 1, 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 445, § 1.

46-8-47.
Determination of directors’ compensation; appointment of chairman and vice-presidents; time and place of board meetings; procedures regarding board meetings.

The board of directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors for services in any capacity unless otherwise provided in the charter or the bylaws.

The board of directors may select or appoint one of their number to be chairman of the board of directors. The chairman of the board of directors or the president may appoint such vice-presidents as he deems necessary and prescribe their terms of office, compensation, and duties when authorized to do so by the bylaws of the corporation.

Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, meetings of the board of directors, whether regular or special, may be held within or without this state. The time and place for holding meetings of the board of directors may be fixed by or under the bylaws, or, if not so fixed, by the board.

Regular meetings of the board of directors may be held with or without notice, as may be prescribed in the bylaws. Special meetings of the board of directors shall be held upon such notice as is prescribed in the bylaws. Unless otherwise prescribed in the bylaws, written notice of the time and place of special meetings of the board of directors shall be given to each director either by personal delivery or by mail, telegram, cablegram, or radiogram at least two days before the meeting.

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need not be given to any director who signs a waiver of notice either before, during, or after a meeting. Attendance of a director at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting and a waiver of all objections to the place of the meeting, the time of the meeting, and the manner in which it was called or convened, provided that a director may state at the beginning of the meeting any such objection to the transaction of business.

Neither the business to be transacted at nor the purpose of any regular or special meeting of the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting, unless required by the bylaws.

A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum exists, may adjourn any meeting of the board of directors to another time and place. Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, notice of any such adjourned meeting shall be given to the directors who were not present at the time of the adjournment and, unless the time and place of the adjourned meeting are announced at the time of the adjournment, to the other directors.

Meetings of the board of directors may be called as prescribed by the bylaws or, if there is no such provision in the bylaws, by the chairman of the board, or, if there is no chairman, by the president of the company.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a different number shall constitute a quorum, a majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or, in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, then of the number stated in the articles of incorporation or of the number last fixed by the shareholders, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In no case shall less than one-third of the total number of directors or fewer than two directors constitute a quorum.

The vote of a majority of the directors present at the time of the vote, if a quorum is present at such time, shall be the act of the board of directors, unless the vote of a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, §§ 3, 8.

46-8-48.
Creation of executive committee and other committees; powers of committees; designation of alternate members of committees; committee action by majority vote.

If the charter or the bylaws of a railroad company incorporated under the laws of this state so provide, the board of directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the full board of directors, may designate from among its members an executive committee and one or more other committees, each consisting of three or more directors, and each of which, to the extent provided in such resolution or in the charter or the bylaws of the corporation, shall have and may exercise all the authority of the board of directors, provided that no such committee shall have the authority of the board of directors in reference to:

Amending the charter or the bylaws of the corporation;

Adopting a plan of merger or consolidation;

The sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all the property and assets of the corporation; or

A voluntary dissolution of the corporation or a revocation thereof.

The board, by resolution adopted in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any such committee, which director may act in place of any absent member at any meeting of such committee.

Unless otherwise provided in the charter or the bylaws, or unless otherwise ordered by the board of directors, any such committee shall act by a majority of its members.

The designation of any such committee and the delegation thereto of authority shall not operate to relieve the board of directors or any member thereof of any responsibility imposed by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, § 4.

46-8-49.
Action by board or committee thereof or by shareholder or committee thereof by written consent of members without meeting.

Unless otherwise provided by the charter or bylaws, any action required by this title to be taken by a railroad company at a meeting of the directors of the corporation, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or of a committee thereof, may be taken without a meeting if written consent setting forth the action so taken is signed by all the directors, or all the members of the committee, as the case may be, and filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the board or of the committee. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote and may be stated as such in any articles or any document filed with any official of the state under this title.

Unless otherwise provided by the charter or bylaws, any action required by the shareholders of a railroad company or any committee thereof may be taken at a meeting of the shareholders. Any action which may be taken at a meeting of the shareholders or by a committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if written consent setting forth the action so taken is signed by all the shareholders or all the members of the committee, as the case may be, and filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the shareholders or committee. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote and may be stated as such in any articles or documents filed with any official of this state under this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 445, § 2.

46-8-50.
Combination of offices of corporation; election of officers by shareholders; terms of office; powers and duties of officers; authority of chairman or president as to legal proceedings.

Any two or more offices provided for by Code Section 46-8-46 may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary.

The charter granted to any railroad corporation under this chapter may provide that all officers or certain specified officers shall be elected by the shareholders instead of by the board of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the charter, bylaws, or resolution of the board of directors, all officers shall be elected or appointed for a term of office running until the meeting of the board following the next annual meeting of shareholders or, in the case of officers elected by the shareholders, until the next annual meeting of shareholders.

Each officer shall hold office for the term for which he is elected or appointed and until his successor has been elected or appointed and has qualified.

All officers and agents of a railroad company shall have such authority and shall perform such duties in the management of the corporation as may be provided in the bylaws or as may be determined by action of the board of directors not inconsistent with the bylaws.

The chairman of the board of directors or the president of the company shall have authority to institute or defend legal proceedings by or against the company either when the directors are in disagreement or when circumstances require action in the name of the company before a meeting of the board of directors can be called.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, § 6.

46-8-51.
Indemnification of persons by railroad corporation; advance of expenses; insuring against liabilities; reports of payments to shareholders; provisions eliminating or limiting liability of director.

A railroad corporation shall have power to indemnify persons, to advance expenses prior to final disposition, and to insure against liabilities and expenses of any proceeding to the full extent permitted by Code Sections 14-2-850 through 14-2-859; provided, however, that such corporation shall comply with the requirements of Code Section 14-2-1621 with respect to reports of such payments to shareholders.

The charter or articles of incorporation of a railroad corporation may, as a matter of election, also set forth a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the railroad corporation or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of duty of care or other duty as a director, provided that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any appropriation, in violation of his duties, of any business opportunity of the corporation;

For acts or omissions which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

For the types of liability set forth in Code Section 14-2-832; or

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit.

No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 589, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1987, p. 849, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 114.

46-8-52.
Exemption of property of stockholders from debts or liabilities of corporation.

All property, whether real or personal, of any stockholder in this state shall be exempt from the debts or liabilities of a railroad corporation, provided that this exemption shall not operate as to the amount of the unpaid subscription of the stockholder to the capital stock of the corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 2165; Civil Code 1910, § 2583; Code 1933, § 94-205.

46-8-53.
Procedure for issuing bonds or increasing capital stock.

In no case shall a railroad corporation issue bonds or increase its capital stock except by a vote of two-thirds of the capital stock of the corporation represented at an annual or special meeting of stockholders called for that purpose, and after each stockholder has been notified in the manner prescribed by the bylaws. In addition to such notice, there shall be published in a newspaper in the city where the principal office of the corporation is located, once a week for four weeks prior to the meeting, a notice stating that an increase of the stock or an issuance of bonds for the road, or both, will be considered at the meeting. No action contemplated under this Code section as to an increase of stock or the issuance of bonds shall be legal unless there is represented at the meeting, in person or by written proxy, a majority of the stock.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 2165; Civil Code 1910, § 2583; Code 1933, § 94-206.

46-8-54.
Adoption of title by railroad companies incorporated, or by persons owning or operating a railroad, prior to December 17, 1892.

Any railroad company incorporated before December 17, 1892, whether by Act of the General Assembly incorporating the same by name or under the general railroad law of the state, may amend its charter either by adopting the provisions of this title or by extending its corporate existence for a period of 50 years from the time of the expiration of its original charter. When any such company shall so amend its charter, it may retain its original organization and the same amount of capital stock provided for in its original charter, and any other powers and privileges, except exemption from taxation, granted in its original charter, which may not be in conflict with this title or any other law relating to the powers and duties of railroad companies, and such amendments shall be without prejudice to any of its prior rights or contracts. The provisions of this title may also be adopted by any persons owning or operating a railroad in this state as of December 17, 1892, without prejudice to such organization as they may have already effected and without prejudice to their existing contracts and obligations.

Whenever any railroad company desires to amend its charter, or whenever any persons desire to adopt the provisions of this title as provided in this Code section, it or they shall file a petition with the Secretary of State setting forth particularly in what manner it is desired to amend such charter or adopt the provisions of this title. When such petition is filed, the Secretary of State shall issue to the company or persons, under the great seal of the state, a certificate setting forth the manner in which the charter is amended, if the petition is for amendment; or, if the petition is to adopt the provisions of this title, then the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate setting forth that said persons are a body corporate with all the powers, duties, and liabilities provided in this title. Before the certificate shall issue, the petitioner or petitioners shall pay to the Secretary of State the fee provided for in Code Section 14-4-183.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 17; Civil Code 1895, § 2178; Civil Code 1910, § 2596; Code 1933, § 94-317.

46-8-55.
Standard of care for directors and officers in discharge of duties; reliance upon financial information.

A director shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith; and

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In discharging his duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes unwarranted the reliance otherwise permitted by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director or any failure to take any action if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this subsection.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith; and

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In discharging his duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

An officer is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes unwarranted the reliance otherwise permitted by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

An officer is not liable for any action as an officer or any failure to take any action if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this subsection.

This Code section shall not relieve any director or officer from liability for the payment of taxes.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-8-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 849, § 7.